Tennessee, session 114, HB0107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-3-104, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (h)(2)(B)-(E) and substituting instead the following:
(B) The personal responsibility plan must also require the parent or other
caretaker relative, regardless of age or disabling status, to enter a plan with
certain obligations, including, but not limited to, requiring the parent or caretaker
relative to cooperate in the establishment and enforcement of child support, and
naming the father of a child for purposes of paternity establishment, unless good
cause not to cooperate exists, as defined by the department.
(C) Unless exempt, refusal or failure to engage in full-time employment,
part-time employment, or other training or work preparation activities prescribed
by subsection (g) without good cause, or the failure to cooperate in the
establishment or enforcement of child support without good cause, must result in
denial of eligibility for, or termination of, temporary assistance for the entire family
unit.
(D) The personal responsibility plan may provide transportation
assistance, if needed, to participate in required activities; provided, that the
department shall first utilize available community transportation resources before
providing such assistance from department funds. The department shall provide
childcare services for those individuals who are receiving benefits, participating in
HB0107
000183
- 1 -

work activities prescribed by subsection (g), and not exempt from work activities
pursuant to this part.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000183